Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 434 Offenses Against Property by Fraud

434.010.
Embezzlement by officer, agent or employe of corporation. [Repealed.]

434.020.
Misapplication of money, bonds, notes and other property of state or political subdivision by custodian. [Repealed.]

434.030.
Embezzlement of property entrusted to person for delivery. [Repealed.]

434.040.
Conversion of motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

434.050.
Obtaining money, property or signature by false pretenses. [Repealed.]

434.060.
Obtaining money by false personation — Personating another in legal acts — Fraudulently displaying badge of organization. [Repealed.]

434.070.
Making or delivering check, draft or order not backed by sufficient funds — Presumption of fraud. [Repealed.]

434.080.
Obtaining money by pretending to be an officer. [Repealed.]

434.090.
Misrepresentations as to financial condition. [Repealed.]

434.095.
Obtaining real estate loan by substituting or making false instrument — Subsequent offenses.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, either substitutes one (1) instrument in writing for another and by this means causes the making of a loan or the extension of credit, or induces by any fraudulent instrument in writing the making of a loan or the extension of credit as a part of a transaction by which either the title to real property is transferred or valuable improvements are placed on real property in this state, whether for the benefit of himself or another, is guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 74, § 1; 1992, ch. 463, § 47, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

False financial statement, issuing, KRS

517.090

.

Theft by deception, KRS

514.040

.

434.100.
Passing or possessing notes of nonexistent or broken bank. [Repealed.]

434.110.
Alteration or destruction of writings of company by officer employe. [Repealed.]

434.120.
Giving false pedigree of stock to purchaser. [Repealed.]

434.130.
Forgery or counterfeiting of writings. [Repealed.]

434.140.
Forging or counterfeiting warrants or receipts of officials or state bonds. [Repealed.]

434.150.
Effect of conviction for forgery on forged instrument.

Judgment of conviction for forgery shall not destroy the legal validity of the writing charged to have been forged, nor shall the conviction be used as evidence in any civil controversy relative to the writing.

History.

1131.

434.155.
Filing illegal lien.

A person is guilty of filing an illegal lien when he files a document or lien that he knows or should have known was forged, groundless, contained a material misstatement, or was a false claim. It shall be an affirmative defense that any material misstatement was not intentional.

Filing an illegal lien is a Class D felony for the first offense, a Class C felony for any second offense, and a Class B felony for any subsequent offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 54, effective July 15, 1998.

434.160.
Counterfeiting seal of corporation. [Repealed.]

434.170.
Counterfeiting coin and passing and possessing it. [Repealed.]

434.180.
Counterfeiting currency and passing and possessing it. [Repealed.]

434.190.
Making or possessing devices used for counterfeiting. [Repealed.]

434.200.
Fraudulent severance of timber, buildings, minerals and fixtures from land under mortgage or vendor’s lien. [Repealed.]

434.210.
Fraudulent concealment or removal of mortgaged personal property. [Repealed.]

434.220.
Disposal or conversion of property without consent of owner. [Repealed.]

434.225.
Removal, transfer, or abandonment of rented or leased personal property — Attempt to defraud lessor.

As used in this section the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Person” means an individual, partnership, association or corporation;

“Address” means the place at which the rented or leased personal property is located;

“Personal property” means household furnishings and appliances.

A person who rents or leases personal property under an agreement to relinquish possession of such property to the lessor at the expiration of the lease or rental period, shall not, prior to the expiration of such period, remove the personal property to any other address and relinquish custody of such property without first giving the lessor at least ten (10) days’ written notice, delivered in person or by certified mail with a return receipt requested.

Removing the personal property, or any part thereof, to a new or different location and relinquishing custody of such property, or permitting another person, not a party to the lease agreement, to take possession of the personal property, or any part thereof, or moving from the address and abandoning the personal property shall constitute prima facie evidence of the lessee’s intention to defraud the lessor.

Any lease under subsection (2) of this section shall recite verbatim subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

Failure of lessor to comply with subsection (4) of this section shall void lessor’s relief herein.

Any person described in subsection (2) of this section who attempts to defraud a lessor of leased personal property shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200), or imprisoned for thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 160, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Theft and related offenses, KRS

514.030

,

514.040

,

514.070

.

434.230.
Presentation of fraudulent claims against state to court. [Repealed.]

434.240.
Falsification of claim against state or political subdivision. [Repealed.]

434.250.
Payment of salary for services not rendered. [Repealed.]

434.260.
False entries to defraud by officers, deputies and assistants of first-class city. [Repealed.]

434.270.
False and deceptive advertising. [Repealed.]

434.275.
False representation of kosher meats and kosher meat preparations — Advertising — Sale of. [Repealed.]

434.280.
Destruction or concealment of will. [Repealed.]

434.290.
Defrauding hotel keeper. [Repealed.]

434.300.
Obtaining insurance or insurance benefit by fraud. [Repealed.]

434.310.
Spreading false rumors regarding solvency of financial institutions.

Any person who willfully and maliciously makes, circulates or transmits to others any false statement, rumor or suggestion, written, printed or by word of mouth, which is directly or by inference derogatory to the financial condition or affects the solvency of any bank or trust company doing business in the state, any foreign or domestic insurance company or any savings and loan association doing business in this state, or who counsels, aids, procures, or induces another to start, transmit or circulate any such statement or rumor shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for not less than twenty (20) nor more than one hundred (100) days, or both.

History.

598a, 869b: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 152, § 164.

434.320.
Insolvent broker to accept no money or securities for margin from customer ignorant of broker’s insolvency.

Any broker who, knowing that he is insolvent, accepts or receives or consents to receiving from a customer ignorant of the broker’s insolvency, deposits of money, stocks, bonds, securities, or other things of value belonging to the customer, to be used as margin for the purchase of stocks, bonds, grain, produce or cotton, otherwise than in payment of or security for an existing indebtedness, and who thereby causes the customer to lose, in whole or in part, such money, stocks, bonds, securities, or other things of value, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

“Broker,” as used in KRS

434.320

,

434.330

, and

434.340

, means any person engaged in the business of buying or selling stocks, bonds, grain, produce, or cotton, as agent or representative of other persons upon margins, and who charges commissions for his services.

History.

1376kk-1, 1376kk-3: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 463, § 48, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Fraud in insolvency, KRS

517.080

.

Insolvent bank not to receive deposits, Const., § 204.

Receiving deposits in failing financial institution, KRS

517.100

.

434.330.
Broker not to pledge or dispose of customer’s securities without customer’s consent.

Any broker who has in his possession any money, stocks, bonds, securities, or other things of value belonging to a customer, without having any lien on them or any special property in them, and pledges them or disposes of them without the customer’s consent, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

1376kk-2: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 463, § 49, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Misapplication of entrusted property, KRS

517.110

.

Theft by failure to make required disposition of property, KRS

514.070

.

434.340.
Liability of officer, manager, agent, or employee of broker.

Every member of a firm of brokers and every officer, manager, agent, or employee of a broker, who knowingly does consent to the doing of any act prohibited by KRS

434.320

or

434.330

shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

1376kk-4: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 463, § 50, effective July 14, 1992.

434.350.
Depriving owner or possessor of motor vehicle through fraud. [Repealed.]

434.360.
Hiring motor vehicle with intent to defraud. [Repealed.]

434.370.
Abandonment or failure to return rented motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

434.380.
Person hiring motor vehicle permitting another to drive in violation of rental agreement. [Repealed.]

434.390.
Fraudulent renting of motor vehicle with deceptive hubdometer or charging hirer on basis of deceptive hubdometer readings. [Repealed.]

434.400.
Fraudulent tampering with hubdometer by hirer of motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

434.410.
Fraudulent changing of speedometer to effect sale of motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

434.415.
Counterfeit nonfunctional, and noncompliant airbags and restraint systems — Penalties.

As used in this section:

“Airbag” means a motor vehicle inflatable occupant restraint system device that is part of a supplemental restraint system;

“Counterfeit supplemental restraint system component” means a replacement supplemental restraint system component, including but not limited to an airbag, that displays a mark identical to, or substantially similar to, the genuine mark of a motor vehicle manufacturer or a supplier of parts to the manufacturer of a motor vehicle without authorization from that manufacturer or supplier, respectively;

“Nonfunctional airbag” means a replacement airbag that meets any of the following criteria:

The airbag was previously deployed or damaged;

The airbag has an electric fault that is detected by the vehicle’s airbag diagnostic system when the installation procedure is completed and the vehicle is returned to the customer who requested the work to be performed or when ownership is intended to be transferred;

The airbag includes a part or object, including a supplemental restraint system component, that is installed in a motor vehicle to mislead the owner or operator of the motor vehicle into believing that a functional airbag has been installed; or

The airbag is subject to the provisions of 49

U.S.C. sec. 30120(j)

; and

“Supplemental restraint system” means a passive inflatable motor vehicle occupant crash protection system designed for use in conjunction with a seat belt assembly as defined in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.209. A supplemental restraint system includes one (1) or more airbags and all components required to ensure that an airbag works as designed by the vehicle manufacturer, including both of the following:

The airbag operates as designed in the event of a crash; and

The airbag is designed to meet federal motor vehicle safety standards for the specific make, model, and year of the vehicle in which it is or will be installed.

Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 534, a person who does any of the following shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or be confined in the county jail for not more than twelve (12) months, or both:

Knowingly imports, manufactures, sells, offers for sale, installs, or reinstalls in a motor vehicle, a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component, a nonfunctional airbag, or an object that does not comply with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 208 provided in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.208 for the make, model, and year of the motor vehicle;

Knowingly sells, offers for sale, installs, or reinstalls in any motor vehicle a device that causes a motor vehicle’s diagnostic system to inaccurately indicate that the motor vehicle is equipped with a properly functioning airbag; or

Knowingly sells, leases, trades, or transfers a motor vehicle if the person knows that a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component, a nonfunctional airbag, or an object that does not comply with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 208 provided in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.208 for the make, model, and year of the motor vehicle has been installed as part of the motor vehicle’s inflatable restraint system.

This section shall not apply to an owner or employee of a motor vehicle dealership or the owner of a vehicle, who, before the sale of the vehicle, does not have knowledge that the vehicle’s airbag, or another component of the vehicle’s supplemental restraint system, is counterfeit or nonfunctioning.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 189, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2022 ch. 237, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

434.420.
Defrauding of person hiring out animals and animal-drawn vehicles — Prosecution — Register to be kept. [Repealed.]

434.430.
Giving street car transfers to persons not entitled to them. [Repealed.]

434.440.
Transmission of false or fraudulent communications over telegraph or telephone lines — Delay of messages. [Repealed.]

434.441.
Definitions for KRS 434.441 and 434.442.

As used in this section and KRS

434.442

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Educational institutions” means those schools providing postsecondary education including technical, community and junior colleges, and colleges and universities;

“Governmental agency” means any agency of the state or local government; and

“Secondary school” means a school with grades nine (9) through twelve (12).

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

434.442.
Fraudulent use of an educational record — Penalty.

A person is guilty of fraudulent use of an educational record when that person, knowingly:

Falsely makes, completes, alters, or procures to be falsely made or altered, or assists in falsely making or altering, a diploma, certificate, license, or transcript indicating academic achievement in an educational program issued by a secondary school, a postsecondary educational institution, or a governmental agency;

Sells, gives, buys, or obtains, or procures to be sold, given, bought or obtained, or assists in selling, giving, buying, or obtaining, a diploma, certificate, license, or transcript which he knows is false, indicating educational achievement in an educational program issued by a secondary school, postsecondary educational institution, or a governmental agency;

Presents or uses as genuine a falsely made or altered diploma, certificate, license, or transcript indicating educational achievement in an educational program in a secondary school, postsecondary educational institution, or a governmental agency; or

Makes a false written representation of fact that he has received a degree or other certification indicating merit, educational achievement, or completion of an educational program involving study, experience, or testing from a secondary school, a postsecondary educational institution, or governmental agency in an application for:

Employment;

Admission to an educational program;

An award; or

The purpose of inducing another to issue a diploma, certificate, license, or transcript indicating educational achievement in an educational program of a secondary school, postsecondary educational institution, or a governmental agency.

Fraudulent use of an educational record is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 170, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

434.444
Misrepresenting current or former military status — Exemptions — Penalties — Transfer of fines revenue — Short title.

A person is guilty of misrepresenting current or former military status when he or she, for the purpose of direct or indirect monetary gain, and with intent to defraud, obtain employment, or be elected or appointed to public office, intentionally makes:

A claim, orally, in writing, or by any fraudulent display, that he or she is entitled to wear military awards, military decorations, or military rank;

A claim that he or she served in the United States Armed Forces, a Reserve Component thereof, or the National Guard; or

A claim that he or she served in the military during a wartime era, whether or not there was a declared war, or served in a combat zone, or makes any misrepresentation of actual military service.

This section shall not apply to a person who or an organization which:

Is reenacting military history or a military event;

Is playing the part of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a Reserve Component thereof, or the National Guard in a play, motion picture television production, or other dramatic production, or at a patriotic or civic event;

Is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a Reserve Component thereof, or the National Guard and, as part of a military assignment, is representing a member of the Armed Forces in a previous war or time period for ceremonial, recruiting, or training purposes;

Is an employee of or volunteer for a museum and, as a part of their duties, is representing a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a Reserve Component thereof, or the National Guard for ceremonial, historical, or training purposes;

Owns, displays, purchases, sells, or trades militaria, including but not limited to medals, ribbons, and rank insignia, and does not claim to have personally earned them unless he or she is legally entitled to do so;

Is a natural person using his or her given name that includes a military rank, so long as he or she does not use the name to defraud another in a manner prohibited by this section;

Uses a name or honorary military or military-like rank which has been bestowed upon him or her by a public officer, public employee, or public agency, in the name of a public officer or public agency;

Uses a corporate, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other name for a business or product which includes a military rank, so long as the name is not used to defraud another in a manner prohibited by this section; or

Holds a registered trademark which includes a military rank or honorary rank, so long as the trademark is not used to defraud another in a manner prohibited by this section.

Misrepresenting current or former military status is:

A violation of KRS

514.040

if the defendant, by the misrepresentation, obtains money or property; and

If the defendant, by the misrepresentation, obtains a public benefit, a violation of the applicable statute that prohibits obtaining that public benefit and provides a specific penalty.

If a violation of subsection (3) of this section is not involved, the defendant shall be fined an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than twelve (12) months, or both.

KRS

431.100

to the contrary notwithstanding, any fine assessed as a penalty for conviction under this section shall be transferred by the circuit clerk and deposited with the veterans program trust fund established by KRS 40.460(2)(b).

This section shall be cited as the Kentucky Stolen Valor Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 115, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). In
2008 Ky. Acts ch 15, sec. 1, under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(a) and (c), during codification renumbering and rearranging of parts of a section have occurred.

434.445.
Unauthorized reproduction and distribution of recorded article or device for sale or rent — Exemption — Confiscation and destruction — Penalties.

Any person who knowingly transfers or causes to be transferred any sounds recorded on a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article on which sounds are recorded, with the intent to sell or cause to be sold for profit or used to promote the sale of any product, such article on which sounds are so transferred without the consent of the owner, shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Each individual manufacture of such recorded article shall constitute a separate offense. “Owner,” for purposes of this section, means the person who owns the original fixation of sounds embodied in the master phonograph record, master disc, master tape, master film, or other device used for reproducing sounds on phonograph records, discs, tapes, films, or other articles upon which sound is recorded and from which the transferred recorded sounds are directly derived.

Any person who knowingly transfers or causes to be transferred to any phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article, any performance, whether live before an audience or transmitted by wire or through the air by radio or television, with the intent to sell or cause to be sold for profit or used to promote the sale of any product, such article onto which such performance is or distributes, causes the distribution of, or possesses for one (1) or more of these purposes, to be transferred without the consent of the performer, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or confined in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both. Each individual transfer or manufacture of such recorded article shall constitute a separate offense. For purposes of this section, a person who is authorized to maintain custody and control over business records that reflect whether or not the owner of the live performance consented to having the live performance recorded or fixed is a proper witness in a proceeding regarding the issue of consent.

Any person who knowingly, or with reasonable grounds to know, advertises or offers for sale or resale, or sells or resells, or as a renter, rents or causes the rental of, or distributes or possesses for such purposes any sound recording manufactured without the consent of the owner, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, or any sound recording manufactured without the consent of the performer shall, be guilty of a Class D felony. Possession of five (5) or more duplicate copies or twenty (20) or more individual copies of such recorded articles, produced without the consent of the owner, shall create a rebuttable presumption that such devices are intended for sale or distribution in violation of this section. Each sale or resale of any such article shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who knowingly sells or distributes, offers to sell or distribute, possesses for the purpose of sale or distribution any phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article now known or later developed on which sounds, images, or both sounds and images have been transferred unless such phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article bears the true name and address of the transferor of the sounds and the name of the actual performer or group in a prominent place on its packaging shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Each sale or distribution of any such article shall constitute a separate offense.

This section does not apply to any person who transfers or causes to be transferred any such sounds or images intended for or in connection with radio or television broadcast or cable transmission or related uses, or for archival purposes, or solely for the personal use of the person transferring or causing the transfer and without any compensation being derived by the person from the transfer.

It shall be the duty of all peace officers within the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the Department of Kentucky State Police upon discovery to confiscate the recorded devices produced in violation of this section. Any recorded device produced in violation of this section, which has come into the custody of a peace officer, shall be forfeited and destroyed by the court having jurisdiction. A record of the place where said recorded devices were seized, the kinds and quantities of recorded devices so destroyed, and of the time, place, and manner of the destruction, shall be kept.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 120, § 1; 1978, ch. 321, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 108, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 317, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Criminal simulation, KRS

516.110

.

434.450.
Evasion of inspection by master of vessel carrying tobacco or flour. [Repealed.]

434.460.
Sale of impure lead and linseed oil as pure lead and linseed oil. [Repealed.]

434.470.
Fraudulent manufacture, sale, gift or use of tokens and slugs. [Repealed.]

434.480.
Prevention of exercise of calling or free import and export, and requiring additional licenses, under pretense of authority. [Repealed.]

434.490.
Defrauding vendor of newspapers. [Repealed.]

434.500.
Defrauding taxicab operator. [Repealed.]

434.510.
Obtaining communications service by fraud. [Repealed.]